Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-347
Installment loans; interest; subject to act.

The payment in money, credit, goods, or things in action, as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commission, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, shall, for purposes of regulation under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, be deemed a loan secured by such assignment, and the amount by which the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of the consideration actually paid, shall, for the purposes of regulation under the act, be deemed interest or charges upon the loan from the date of payment to the date the compensation is payable. Such transaction shall be governed by and be subject to the act.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 14, p. 764;

Laws 1973, LB 39, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 36;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 68.